Maine, session 132, LD942.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §2, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Federal grants designated for livestock farmers. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, ensure that any federal grant for which livestock farmers may be
eligible gives priority to small and midsize farms as defined by the commissioner by rule.
Sec. 2. 7 MRSA §2, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. State grants. Issue clear state grant application requirements and, in collaboration
with stakeholders, create a process for evaluating state grants under this Title. Stakeholders
must include, but are not limited to, owners of small and midsize livestock and nonlivestock
farms and processors as defined by the commissioner by rule.
Sec. 3. 7 MRSA §2, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Shared-use kitchens. Develop, establish and prioritize shared-use kitchen
programming to enable midsize farms as defined by the commissioner by rule to:
A. Build shared-use kitchen infrastructure; and
B. Increase processing capability for agricultural products as defined in section 152,
subsection 2 for personal use and local community demand.
Sec. 4. Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to adopt
rules. By June 30, 2025, the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry shall
adopt rules to define "small and midsize farms" and "small and midsize livestock and
nonlivestock farms and processors"; create a process for evaluating state grants under the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 7, section 2, subsection 8; and develop, establish and
prioritize shared-use kitchen programming pursuant to Title 7, section 2, subsection 9.
Page 1 - 132LR1074(01)

Sec. 5. Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry; report. By
August 15, 2025, the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry shall submit a
report to the Joint Standing Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry on the
rule-making process under section 4 and how the department and the rules will assist and
prioritize small and midsize farms.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.